Illinois, session 104th, HB5082.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Lead Poisoning 6Screening, Prevention, and Abatement Fund to the Environmental 7Protection Agency for grants to municipalities to replace lead 8service lines. 9    Section 10. The sum of $90,000,000, or so much of that sum 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Environmental Protection Agency for grants to 12municipalities to replace lead service lines. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142026.